Utah statutes.
54-13-2.   Commission's responsibilities.

The commission is responsible for establishing safety standards and practices for intrastate pipeline transportation and shall make and enforce rules required by the federal Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act to maintain state control over the regulation of intrastate pipeline transportation.

